California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
(b) The seed screenings or cleanings have been processed under the supervision of, and to the satisfaction of, the commissioner by grinding, or otherwise, to render the seed of any pest incapable of reproduction.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

7572.

The commissioner may permit the movement of seed screenings or cleanings for the purpose of destruction or processing.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

7573.

If, upon inspection by the commissioner, any seed screenings or cleanings from crop seed are found to contain the seed of any pest, the commissioner shall give notice in writing of such fact to the person in possession of the screenings or cleanings. The notice shall order that the screenings or cleanings be processed or destroyed, as provided in this article, within 60 days.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

7574.

If the person that is notified by the commissioner is not the owner of the screenings or cleanings, the person so notified shall forthwith transmit the notice to the owner. He shall cause the screenings or cleanings to be processed or destroyed, as directed by the owner, pursuant to the provisions of this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

7575.

If the owner fails or neglects to direct the disposition of the screenings or cleanings within 10 days after the notice has been transmitted to him, the person in possession of the screenings or cleanings, at his option, may do one of the following:

(a) Cause the screenings or cleanings to be processed and return to the owner the value of the screenings or cleanings less the cost of handling.

(b) Destroy the screenings or cleanings. He is not liable to the owner for the destruction of such screenings or cleanings.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

7576.

Any lot of seed screenings or cleanings from crop seed which contains the seed of any pest, together with its containers, is a public nuisance. If such lot is not disposed of pursuant to this article, it is subject to seizure on complaint of the director or the commissioner to a court of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

7577.

The district attorney of the county in which the nuisance is found, at the request of the director or the commissioner, shall maintain, in the name of the people of the State of California, a civil action to abate and prevent such nuisance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 26.)
-------------------------------------------

7578.

Upon judgment and by order of the court, the lot which is a nuisance shall be handled in one of the following ways:

(a) Condemned and destroyed in the manner directed by the court.

(b) Denatured or otherwise processed to render the seed of any pest incapable of reproduction.

(c) Released upon such conditions as the court may impose to insure that the nuisance will be abated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 25.)
-------------------------------------------

7579.

If the owner fails to comply with the order of the court within the time which is specified in the order, the court may order disposal, or sale, under such terms and conditions as the court may prescribe, by the director or the commissioner, or by the sheriff or marshal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 872, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

7580.

If the court orders the sale of any of the seed screenings or cleanings from crop seed, or containers, which can be salvaged, the cost of disposal shall be deducted from the proceeds of sale and the balance paid into court for the owner.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

7581.

A proceeding pursuant to this article where the value of the property seized amounts to thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000) or less is a limited civil case.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 861, Sec. 9.   (SB 71)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Crop Seed Cleaning Business [7601. - 7603.]

7601.

Every person, before engaging for hire in the business of cleaning crop seed, shall obtain a permit from the commissioner to operate each separate portable seed cleaner which is being used for the first time in the county.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

7602.

Upon application by the owner for such permit or if the commissioner deems it necessary to determine that the cleaner is free from the seed of any pest, the commissioner may cause an inspection to be made of the cleaner of each permittee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 25.)
-------------------------------------------

7603.

The permit may be suspended or revoked by the commissioner at any time the permittee does not comply with any of the provisions of this division, or any regulations which are adopted pursuant to this division by the director relative to preventing the dissemination of the seed of any noxious weed pest.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4.5. Invasive Species Council of California [7700. - 7708.]

7700.

(a) (1) There is in state government the Invasive Species Council of California. The purpose of the council is to help coordinate a comprehensive effort to prevent the introduction of invasive species in the state and to advise state agencies, including, but not limited to, the department and the Natural Resources Agency, within their respective authorities how to facilitate coordinated, complementary, and cost-effective control or eradication of invasive species that have entered or are already established in the state.

(2) In all activities of the council pursuant to this part, the council shall prioritize
 all of the following:

(A) Exclusion and prevention practices to keep invasive species from entering the state.

(B) Early detection and rapid response to keep invasive species of limited distribution from spreading in the state.

(C) Integrated pest management for controlling invasive species already established in the state.

(3) This part shall not prohibit the department from serving
 as the state’s governing authority in invasive pest and plant management, as specified in this division.

(b) The Invasive Species Council of California shall consist of the following six members:

(1) The secretary or their designated representative.

(2) The Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency or their designated representative.

(3) The Secretary for Environmental Protection or their designated representative.

(4) The Secretary of Transportation or their designated representative.

(5) The Secretary of California Health and
 Human Services or their designated representative.

(6) The Director of Emergency Services or their designated representative.

(c) The Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency or their designated representative and the secretary or their designee shall serve as cochairs of the council.

(d) The Invasive Species Council of California shall meet annually and as needed as determined by the cochairs.

(e) The secretary may designate a staff liaison to further the purposes of this part.

(f) (1) The Invasive Species Council of California may establish advisory committees and ad hoc
 working groups, as necessary, to advise on a broad array of issues related to preventing the introduction of invasive species and providing for their control or eradication, as well as minimizing the economic, ecological, and human health impacts that invasive species cause.

(2) The advisory committees and working groups may consist of representatives from state agencies, federal agencies, county agricultural commissioners, academia, nonprofit organizations, tribal nations, industry representatives, and members of the public.

(g) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Integrated pest management” has the same meaning as defined in Section 11401.7.

(2) “Invasive species” means nonnative organisms that cause, or are likely to cause, economic or environmental harm. “Invasive species” does not include humans, domestic livestock, domestic or domesticated species exempted pursuant to Section 2118 of the Fish and Game Code, or nonharmful nonnative organisms.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 720, Sec. 1.   (AB 2509)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

7702.

Upon the appropriation or transfer of adequate moneys to the Invasive Species Account, created pursuant to Section 7706, the Invasive Species Council of California may make recommendations on invasive species projects and activities, including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(a) To assist state, federal, and local agencies to prevent the introduction of invasive species.

(b) To relevant state agencies and departments regarding any of the following:

(1) Detection, control, and eradication of invasive species, including emergency and nonemergency detection and rapid response.

(2) Development and maintenance of statewide surveys and mapping of high-risk areas.

(3) Improvement of inspections at state and national boundaries to prevent the introduction of invasive species.

(c) To develop comprehensive reports on the ecological, agricultural, and economic impacts of invasive species.

(d) To develop statewide education, outreach, and branding of invasive species.

(e) To increase coordination and collaboration among invasive species partners.

(f) To develop statewide invasive species action plans, including the plan required pursuant to Section 7708.

(g) To host an annual California
 Invasive Species Summit to develop new recommendations and to coordinate invasive species activities.

(h) (1) To develop a report containing activities of the Invasive Species Council of California and recommendations to improve invasive species management.

(2) The council shall submit the report developed pursuant to this subdivision to the Legislature and the Governor.

(3) A report to be submitted to the Legislature pursuant to this subdivision shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 870, Sec. 3.   (AB 2470)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

7704.

The Invasive Species Council of California may establish the California Invasive Species Advisory Committee, which shall consist of the following 19 members:

(a) Four members designated by the secretary.

(b) Four members designated by the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency or his or her designated representative.

(c) One member appointed by the Secretary for Environmental Protection or his or her designated representative.

(d) One member appointed by the Secretary of Transportation or his or her designated representative.

(e) One member appointed by the Secretary of California Health and Human Services or his or her designated representative.

(f) One member appointed by the Director of Emergency Services or his or her designated representative.

(g) Six members appointed by the cochairs of the Invasive Species Council of California to create a diverse makeup of federal, nonprofit organization, tribal, industry, and other representatives.

(h) One member appointed by the California Agricultural Commissioners and Sealers Association.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 870, Sec. 3.   (AB 2470)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

7706.

(a) The Invasive Species Account is hereby established in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund. Moneys in the account are available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the secretary for the purposes of funding invasive species projects and activities recommended by the Invasive Species Council of California.

(b) Moneys in the Invasive Species Account appropriated by the Legislature for allocation by the secretary for the purposes of this part may be allocated without regard to fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 870, Sec. 3.   (AB 2470)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

7708.

(a) The Invasive Species Council of California shall coordinate with state and local public agencies, publicly funded educational institutions, and stakeholder groups to develop a plan for the cure or suppression of diseases associated with the spread of invasive shot hole borers, including, but not limited to, the Polyphagous and Kuroshio shot hole borers.

(b) (1) Upon the completion of the plan required pursuant to subdivision (a), the department, subject to the availability of appropriations for those specified purposes, shall support the efforts of state and local agencies, California Native American tribes, and nonprofits to cure or suppress the diseases affiliated with the invasive shot hole borer infestation as
 provided in paragraph (2).

(2) Support provided by the department pursuant to this section may include, but is not limited to, the following:

(A) Grants to support research related to the identification of infected trees and methods to prevent further infestation.

(B) Grants to state and local agencies, California Native American tribes, and nonprofits to support suppression or cure efforts.

(c) No state moneys shall be awarded to a local agency pursuant to subdivision (b) unless the local agency has contributed from local resources a dollar amount that is equal to the dollar amount of state moneys to be awarded or the local agency is located in a disadvantaged community, as identified pursuant to Section 39711 of the Health and Safety
 Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 870, Sec. 3.   (AB 2470)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 5. CITRUS PEST DISTRICT CONTROL LAW [8401. - 8759.]



  CHAPTER 1. Definitions and General Provisions [8401. - 8410.]

8401.

This part shall be known as the Citrus Pest District Control Law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 904, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8402.

It is the purpose of this part to make available a procedure for the organization, operation, government, and dissolution of districts for the more effective control and eradication of citrus pests, whichever products the district is established to protect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 904, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

8403.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this chapter govern the construction of this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

8404.

“Board” means the board of directors of a district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

8405.

“Citrus acreage” means any parcel, tract, or lot of land with 25 or more citrus trees of any age growing on it, except a parcel, tract, or lot which is used as a nursery.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 904, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

8406.

“Citrus pest” includes any infectious, transmissible, or contagious disease, any form of animal life, or any form of vegetable life infesting citrus trees or citrus fruits.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 904, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

8407.

“District” means a citrus pest control district organized pursuant to this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 904, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

8408.

“Number of trees per acre of average planting,” for the purpose of assessment pursuant to this part, shall be 100 trees per acre.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

8409.

“Owner” includes joint owner, coowner, guardian, executor, administrator, or any other person that holds property in a trust capacity under appointment of court.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

8410.

“Citrus” includes “citrous” and any plants of the genera Citrus, Fortunella, Poncirus, and all hybrids having one or more of such as parents.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 33.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Formation of Districts [8451. - 8465.]

8451.

Proceedings for the formation of a district within any county shall be commenced by a petition which is signed by the owners of not less than 51 percent by area of the land in the proposed district within the county devoted exclusively to the growing of citrus fruits. The petition shall be addressed to, and filed with, the board of supervisors of the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 904, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

8452.

The petition may be filed in sections each of which shall comply with all the requirements for a petition, except that a section need not contain the total number of signatures required for the petition.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

8453.

Signatures to the petition may be withdrawn at any time before it has been acted upon by filing with the clerk of the board of supervisors a declaration signed by the petitioner which states that it is the intention of the petitioner to withdraw his signature from the petition.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

8454.

(a) The petition shall state the name of the proposed district and shall set forth its boundaries or describe the lands to be included in it.

(b) It is a sufficient designation of the boundaries of a proposed district to recite that all the citrus acreage in the county is to be included in the district, or that all the citrus acreage in a designated area within the county is to be included in the district.

(c) If either designation is used, the outside boundary of the area so designated is the boundary of the district and the district shall include all area within the outside boundary, if the district is formed pursuant to this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 904, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

8455.

Upon the presentation and filing of a petition, the board of supervisors shall fix a time and place for the hearing of the petition and shall refer the petition to the commissioner for investigation and report.

The hearing shall not be less than 20 days, nor more than 40 days after such presentation and filing.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

8456.

The board of supervisors shall order the clerk of the board of supervisors to give notice of the time and place fixed for the hearing upon the petition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

8457.

The notice of hearing shall do all of the following:

(a) State the name of the district and that it is being formed for the eradication and control of citrus pests.

(b) State the petition is available for inspection at the office of the clerk of the board of supervisors.

(c) Designate the boundaries of the proposed district in substantially the same way that they are described in the petition.

(d) State the time and place for the hearing.

(e) State that at the hearing protests will be considered by the board of supervisors.

(f) State that requests in writing for the exclusion of lands, from, or the inclusion of lands in, the proposed district will be heard and considered by the board of supervisors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 904, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

8458.

Notice of the hearing shall be given by publication in a newspaper of general circulation published and circulated in the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

8459.

The notice shall be published once a week for two successive weeks prior to the date set for the hearing.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

8460.

At the hearing, the report of the commissioner shall be received and protests may be made orally or in writing by any person interested in the formation of the proposed district. Any protest which pertains to the regularity or sufficiency of the proceedings shall be in writing and shall clearly set forth the irregularities and defects to which objection is made. All written protests shall be filed with the clerk of the board of supervisors on or before the time fixed for the final hearing. The hearing may be continued from time to time not exceeding 60 days.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

8461.

At the hearing, any owner of citrus acreage in the proposed district may present to the board of supervisors a request in writing for the exclusion of that land or any part of that land from, and any owner of citrus acreage outside the proposed district may present to the board of supervisors a request in writing for inclusion of the land in, the proposed district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 904, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

8462.

If the board of supervisors determines that the petition does not comply with the requirements of law, the matter may be dismissed without prejudice to the right to present a new petition covering the same matter. A finding by the board of supervisors in favor of the genuineness and sufficiency of the petition and notice is final and conclusive against all persons except the state in a proceeding brought by the Attorney General within one year of the date of the making of the order establishing and describing the boundaries of the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

8463.

(a) If the board of supervisors determines that the project is feasible and in the interest of the citrus growers of the county, the board of supervisors shall, by order entered in its minutes, declare the district duly organized under the name designated in the petition for the formation of the district.

(b) The order shall describe the territory included in the district and, if the board of supervisors does not exclude or include land pursuant to Section 8465, it is a sufficient description of the territory to describe the boundaries in substantially the same way as they are described in the petition. A copy of the order duly certified by the clerk of the board of supervisors shall be filed for record in the office of the county recorder of the county in which the district is situated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 904, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

8464.

Any district formed prior to March 2, 1961, in which the order of the board of supervisors adopted the description in general terms as it appears in the petition is hereby validated.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

8465.

(a) In determining the boundaries of the district, the board of supervisors shall exclude from the district any citrus acreage which it finds will not be benefited by the proposed project, and it may include in the district any lands which it finds will be benefited if it also finds it will be to the interest of the district to include these lands. The inclusion may be upon application of the owner or, without the owner’s application, upon giving the owner notice of the proposed inclusion and an opportunity for a hearing on it.

(b) Notice of inclusion shall be mailed, postage prepaid, by the clerk of the board of supervisors, to the address of the owner of the land as shown by the last equalized county assessment roll, and to any person that has filed with the clerk that person’s name and address and description of land in which he or she has either a legal or equitable interest. The notice shall describe the land proposed to be included, and shall state the time and place at which objections to the inclusion will be heard.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 904, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Organization of Districts [8501. - 8508.]

8501.

Upon the adoption of the order of organization, the board of supervisors shall immediately appoint a board of directors of five members to administer the affairs of the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

8502.

In order to be eligible to hold the office of director of the district, a person shall be a citizen of the United States and of this state, and an owner of lands within the district which are devoted, in whole or in part, to the growing of the product for which the district is established.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1101, Sec. 14.   Effective September 21, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

8503.

Upon his appointment, each director shall, in the manner provided by law, give such official bond for the faithful performance of his duties as shall be fixed by the board of supervisors and shall subscribe the oath of office and such bond and oath shall be filed with the county clerk.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

8504.

From and after the filing for record of the order of the board of supervisors declaring the district organized, and the appointment and qualification of its first board of directors, the organization of the district is complete.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

8505.

Immediately after the organization of the district, the directors shall meet and organize as a board and shall elect a chairman, a vice chairman, a secretary, and an assistant secretary, from among their own number.

The chairman shall call and preside at all meetings of the board, sign all warrants drawn on the county treasurer and all contracts and other documents, and the minutes of all meetings at which he is present. In case of his absence from a meeting, the vice chairman shall act as chairman pro tempore for him. The vice chairman has the authority to sign warrants in place of the chairman if the chairman is absent from a meeting or unavailable.

The secretary shall give notice of and keep the minutes of all meetings and prepare and have custody of all records and papers, and have custody of the seal of the district. He or the assistant secretary shall attest all warrants drawn on the county treasurer, all contracts and other documents and shall sign the minutes of all meetings at which he is present. He shall prepare the annual reports and any other reports required by the board and shall prepare all notices and all calls for bids. In case of his absence from a meeting, the assistant secretary shall perform his duties.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

8506.

The members of the board shall serve for terms of four years and until the appointment and qualification of their successors.

The terms of the members of the first board appointed by the board of supervisors shall divide themselves by lot and one member shall serve for a term of one year, one member shall serve for a term of two years, one member shall serve for a term of three years, and two members shall serve for a term of four years.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

8507.

Upon the expiration of the term of any member of the board, the board of supervisors shall appoint his successor.

Vacancies shall be filled by the board of supervisors for the unexpired term.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

8508.

The members of the board are not entitled to any compensation for their services, but may be reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses, when claims for such expenses have been approved by the board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Powers and Duties of the District [8551. - 8568.]

8551.

The district shall have perpetual succession and may do all of the following:

(a) Sue and be sued in all actions and proceedings in all courts and tribunals of competent jurisdiction.

(b) Adopt a seal and alter it at pleasure.

(c) Take by grant, purchase, gift, devise, lease, or otherwise, and hold, use and enjoy, and lease, or otherwise dispose of, real and personal property of every kind and description within or without the district necessary to the full and
 convenient exercise of its powers.

(d) Cause assessments to be levied, as provided in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 8601) to pay any obligation of the district and to accomplish the purposes of the district in the manner provided in this part.

(e) Make contracts, and employ, except as otherwise provided in this part, all persons, firms, and corporations necessary to carry out the purposes and the powers of the district, and at any salary, wage, or other compensation as the board of directors shall determine.

(f) Eradicate, remove, or prevent the spread of any and all citrus pests.

(g) Enter into or upon any land included within the boundaries of the district for the purpose of inspecting and treating the citrus trees and other host plants and fruit
 growing on them.

(h) Perform any and all acts either within or outside the district necessary or proper to fully and completely carry out the purposes for which the district was organized.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 904, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

8552.

Every district formed pursuant to this part has all of the powers prescribed by Section 8551 and other sections of this part, including the power to eradicate, remove, or prevent the spread of each and every citrus pest, regardless of any language in the petition for formation for any district or in any of the proceedings leading to formation which might seem to limit the power of the district to the control or eradication of one or more citrus pests in particular.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 904, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

8553.

(a) A district may pay limited compensation to the owner of any citrus tree infected with citrus tristeza virus which is removed by the district or by the owner within 15 days after written notice of the infection to the owner by the district. The limited compensation shall not exceed the following payment schedule, with the age of the tree being conclusively established as of the time written notice of the infection is first given to the owner.

(b) The schedule of payments is as follows:Age of treesMaximum payment1 year$ 5.00 per tree2 years 7.50 per tree3 years 10.00 per tree4 years 14.00 per tree5 years 17.50 per tree6 years 20.75 per tree7 years or older 25.00 per tree(c) For the purposes of this section, the holder of the record title of the real property on which the trees are located shall be considered to be the owner of the citrus trees to whom written
 notice of infection is given.

(d) The written notice referred to in subdivision (a) shall be a written or printed document labeled “Notice of Infection,” addressed to the owner and informing the owner of the existence of the infected trees, their location, and that they should be removed forthwith.

(e) For the purposes of determining the age of infected citrus trees under this section, trees shall be considered one year old as of the January 1st succeeding the calendar year in which they are planted, and shall be deemed one year older on the January 1st of each succeeding year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 44, Sec. 1.   Effective June 3, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

8554.

In order to expedite the elimination of the source of citrus tristeza virus, if it appears to the board that the cost of testing, indexing, or retesting trees to determine infection may exceed the cost of removal, plus the payment of limited compensation, a district may, with the consent of the owner, remove and pay limited compensation pursuant to Section 8553 for trees which have not been determined to be infected with citrus tristeza virus.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 904, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

8555.

Any payment made to the owner or owners of citrus trees removed pursuant to Section 8553 or 8554 shall in no event exceed the sum of three thousand dollars ($3,000) per geographical acre.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 904, Sec. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

8556.

The commissioner of the county in which the district is located shall, upon request of the board and without fee or charge, supervise and direct, in accordance with the best known and accepted methods as determined by the board, all activities undertaken by the district for the control or eradication of citrus pests.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 904, Sec. 18.)
-------------------------------------------

8557.

The board shall, immediately after its qualification, formulate an effective plan based on the best known and accepted methods for the control and eradication of the citrus pests within the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 904, Sec. 19.)
-------------------------------------------

8558.

After the final adoption of the plan, the board shall make or cause to be made an estimate of the cost of operating the plan for the next fiscal year beginning not sooner than 90 days thereafter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

8559.

Within 30 days after the receipt of the estimate, the board shall adopt a preliminary budget of expenditures for such fiscal year.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

8560.

Upon the adoption of the preliminary budget, the board shall fix a time and place for holding a hearing thereon.

The hearing shall not be less than 20 days, nor more than 40 days, after the adoption of the preliminary budget.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

8561.

The board shall give notice of the time and place fixed for the hearing upon the preliminary budget by publication in a newspaper of general circulation published and circulated in the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

8562.

The notice shall be published once a week for two successive weeks prior to the date set for the hearing.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

8563.

The notice shall contain all of the following:

(a) A summary of the proposed budget and shall refer to the original on file with the board for further particulars.

(b) State that it is the intention to raise the amount of money required to meet the proposed budget by levying an assessment upon the assessed value of the citrus trees within the district in accordance with this part.

(c) A statement of the day, hour, and place, when and where any and all persons
 interested may appear and object to the adoption of the budget or to any item in it.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 904, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

8564.

At any time not later than the hour set for hearing objections to the proposed budget, any owner of citrus acreage in the district may make written protest against the budget or any item in it.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 904, Sec. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

8565.

At the time set for hearing protests, the board shall proceed to hear and pass upon all protests so made and its decision on the protests shall be final and conclusive.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

8566.

At the conclusion of the hearing, the board shall by resolution entered on its minutes make such changes in the proposed budget as it finds are proper and advisable. The tentative budget as so changed or modified shall be the budget of the district for the forthcoming fiscal year.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

8567.

There may be added to the budget for the first fiscal year of the operation of the district an amount not in excess of 20 percent of the total amount of the budget to cover the preliminary expenses of the district and for the expenses of operation up to the beginning of the first fiscal year.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

8568.

For each fiscal year subsequent to the first year of operation of the district, the board shall adopt the final budget therefor in the same manner and at the same time that the budget for the first fiscal year was adopted.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Levying and Assessing Taxes for District Purposes [8601. - 8610.]

8601.

(a) The county assessor, in making the annual assessment of property in each and every year after the organization of the district, shall assess any parcel of real property with 25 or more citrus trees on it and enter as a separate item, on the assessment roll for each such parcel of real propety included in the district, the value, as improvements on the parcel, of all citrus trees which are growing on it.

(b) For the purpose of this part, the county assessor shall assess all citrus acreage at a uniform value per acre. The assessment shall be upon an acreage basis and the number of acres shall be determined conclusively, except as otherwise provided in this section, by the assessor counting the trees and dividing the total number by the number of trees per acre of average planting. The county assessor in counting the citrus trees shall not, however, count any more than 200 trees on any one acre of land, and for any citrus acreage which has from 70 to 100 trees per acre the number of acres to be determined by the county assessor shall be the actual acreage of the parcel.

(c) Upon completing the assessment roll of the county in each year, the assessor shall separately compute and certify, to the board of supervisors, the total assessed value, as shown by the assessment roll, of all the citrus trees in the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 904, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

8602.

Whenever acreage within the district is planted with citrus trees in such a fashion as to qualify as citrus acreage, the acreage is subject to assessment as provided in this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 904, Sec. 23.)
-------------------------------------------

8603.

Whenever any citrus trees have been removed from any parcel of land included in the district, the owner of the parcel of land may file with the board an affidavit particularly describing the parcel of land, and setting forth the fact of the removal therefrom of the trees. Thereupon, the board shall cause an investigation of the parcel of land to be made and, if the board finds the allegations of the affidavit are true, the board shall immediately certify this fact to the county assessor and the amount of citrus acreage removed shall not be assessed on the next assessment roll.
